Hawaii statutes.
[§312-3.3] Reallocation of vacant
positions. The state librarian shall promote innovative, efficient, and
effective management, without regard to the position variance requirements of
the department of budget and finance, and may:

(1) Reallocate existing vacant positions throughout
the public library system;

(2) Directly authorize and implement internal
reorganization actions; and

(3) Create temporary positions as necessary; provided
that:

(A) The expenditures of the public library
system shall not exceed its allocated budget;

(B) The term of each position shall not
exceed one year; and

(C) The state librarian shall report the
creation of temporary positions to the department of budget and finance. [L
1996, c 196, §1; am L 1999, c 130, §2; am L 2001, c 108, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next